Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2304
Approved certifying body, defined.

Approved certifying body means a national certification organization which certifies qualified licensed nurses for advanced practice in a clinical specialty area and which (1) requires eligibility criteria related to education and practice, (2) offers an examination in an advanced nursing area which meets current psychometric guidelines and tests, and (3) is approved by the board.

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 37;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1716.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 796.